Wisconsin, session 2025, AB807.
do enact as follows:AB807,13Section 1. 59.42 (4) of the statutes is created to read:AB807,2,5459.42 (4) Board counsel. In any county that employs a corporation counsel, 5including a corporation counsel jointly designated by 2 or more counties, and that 6has a county executive or county administrator, there is created, independent of the 1corporation counsel, the office of board counsel. Board counsel is appointed by the 2county board and serves at the pleasure of the county board. Board counsel and any 3deputy board counsels shall be attorneys at law licensed in this state. The duties of 4board counsel are to provide advice and legal service to the county board. The 5board may leave the office of board counsel unfilled at the pleasure of the board.AB807,2,66